Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Article 21. Special Liens on Real Estate or Other Property.
§ 85-7-431.
Payment bond as substitution for subcontractor or materialmen liens.

Where a contractor gives a payment bond providing payment protection to subcontractors and material suppliers to the full extent provided by the Mississippi Little Miller Act found at Section 31-5-51 or the private project bond provision at Section 85-7-432, the payment bond shall be in substitution for the liens provided for a subcontractor or materialman in this article. The contractor’s right to a lien is not affected by the provision of a bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2014); Laws, 2019, ch. 346, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 85-7-432.
Private project construction bonds; requirements; right to sue; right of action; persons protected by payment bond.

Any person entering into a formal contract for the construction, alteration, or repair of any private building or other private work, before entering into such contract, may furnish to the owner, bonds with good and sufficient surety in which case the bonds shall conform to the requirements of this chapter as follows:

A performance bond shall be payable to, in favor of or for the protection of such owner, for the work to be done in an amount not less than the amount of the contract, conditioned for the full and faithful performance of the contract;

A payment bond shall be payable to the owner but conditioned for the prompt payment of all persons supplying labor or material used in the execution of the work under the contract, for the use of each such person, in an amount not less than the amount of the contract; and

The bonds herein provided for may be made by any surety company which is authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi and listed on the United States Treasury Department’s list of acceptable sureties.

Every person who has furnished labor or material used in the execution of the private work provided for in such contract, in respect of which a payment bond is furnished, and who has not been paid in full for such before the expiration of a period of ninety (90) days after the date on which the last of the labor was performed by him or her or the last of the materials was furnished by him or her and for which such claim is made, provided the same has been approved, where required, by the owner or its architect or engineers, or such approval is being withheld as a result of unreasonable acts of the contractor, shall have the right to sue on such payment bond for the amount, or the balance thereof that is due and payable, but unpaid at the time of institution of such suit and to prosecute said action to final execution and judgment. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, if the amount claimed in such action is subject to contractual provisions or conditions, between the parties involved in such action, the action shall be abated pending the performance of such provisions and the fulfillment of such conditions.

Any person having direct contractual relationship with a subcontractor, but no contractual relationship express or implied with the contractor furnishing the private work payment bond shall have a right of action upon the said payment bond upon giving written notice to said contractor within ninety (90) days from the date on which such person did or performed the last of the labor or furnished or supplied the last of the material for which such claim is made, stating with substantial accuracy the amount claimed and the name of the party to whom the material was furnished or supplied or for whom the labor was done or performed. Such notice shall be given in writing by the claimant to the contractor or surety at any place where the contractor or surety maintains an office or conducts business. Such notice may be personally delivered by the claimant to the contractor or surety, or it may be mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, or emailed with a receipt of a read receipt, to the contractor or surety. No such action may be maintained by any person not having a direct contractual relationship with the contractor principal, unless the notice required by this section shall have been given.

The only persons protected by such payment bond, subject to the notice provisions of this section are:

Subcontractors and material suppliers of the contractor;

Sub-subcontractors and material suppliers of those subcontractors named in subsection (4)(a) of this subsection; and

Laborers who have performed work on the project site.

When suit is instituted on a performance bond given in accordance with this chapter, it shall be commenced within one (1) year after the obligee shall have made final payment on the contract; provided, however, if the contract is abandoned by the general contractor as bond principal or is terminated by the bond obligee, suit shall be commenced within one (1) year after the earlier of the abandonment by the bond principal or termination by the bond obligee.

When suit is instituted on a payment bond given in accordance with this chapter, it shall be commenced within one (1) year after the day on which the last of the labor was performed or material was supplied by the person bringing the action and not later.

Any suit brought on a performance or payment bond given in accordance with this chapter shall be brought in the county in which the contract or some part thereof was performed or in the county in which service of process may be obtained upon either the principal or the surety on such bond. Service of process on the surety through the Commissioner of Insurance does not satisfy the venue requirement of this section.

Any person supplying labor or materials for the execution of the work shall, upon a written request to the owner/obligee, or to the contractor/principal, be furnished promptly with a true and correct copy of the contract and bonds within thirty (30) days of the request or the recipient of the request shall thereafter become liable for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs in any subsequent action under this section. The written request may be evidenced by any reliable means of delivery.

Whenever any person supplying labor or material in the execution of the work brings an action on such payment bond and the trial judge finds that the defense raised to such action by the contractor or surety was not reasonable, or not in good faith, or merely for the purpose of delaying payment, then the trial judge may, in his discretion, award the claimant a reasonable amount to be determined by the trial judge as claimant’s attorney’s fees in bringing such successful action. Likewise, if the trial judge finds that such action was brought by claimant without just cause or in bad faith, the trial judge may, in his discretion, award the contractor or surety a reasonable amount to be determined by the trial judge as attorney’s fees for defending such action; provided, however, this section shall not affect the right of any person to recover attorney’s fees where provided by contract or bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 346, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 85-7-433.
Forms; interim waiver and release upon payment; waiver and release upon final payment; affidavit of nonpayment; notice of contest of lien; pre-lien notice to owner.

The following form is the Interim Waiver and Release Upon Payment form referred to in Section 85-7-419:

INTERIM WAIVER AND RELEASE UPON PAYMENT

STATE OF MISSISSIPPI

COUNTY OF_______________

THE UNDERSIGNED MECHANIC AND/OR MATERIALMAN HAS BEEN EMPLOYED BY_______________(NAME OF CONTRACTOR) TO FURNISH_______________(DESCRIBE MATERIALS AND/OR LABOR) FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF IMPROVEMENTS KNOWN AS_______________(TITLE OF THE PROJECT OR BUILDING) WHICH IS LOCATED IN THE CITY OF_______________ , COUNTY OF_______________ , AND IS OWNED BY_______________(NAME OF OWNER) AND MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:

(DESCRIBE THE PROPERTY UPON WHICH THE IMPROVEMENTS WERE MADE BY USING EITHER A METES AND BOUNDS DESCRIPTION, THE LAND LOT DISTRICT, BLOCK AND LOT NUMBER, OR STREET ADDRESS OF THE PROJECT.)

UPON THE RECEIPT OF THE SUM OF $ _______________ , THE MECHANIC AND/OR MATERIALMAN WAIVES AND RELEASES ANY AND ALL LIENS OR CLAIMS OF LIENS IT HAS UPON THE FOREGOING DESCRIBED PROPERTY OR ANY RIGHTS AGAINST ANY LABOR AND/OR MATERIAL BOND THROUGH THE DATE OF_______________(DATE) AND EXCEPTING THOSE RIGHTS AND LIENS THAT THE MECHANIC AND/OR MATERIALMAN MIGHT HAVE IN ANY RETAINED AMOUNTS, ON ACCOUNT OF LABOR OR MATERIALS, OR BOTH, FURNISHED BY THE UNDERSIGNED TO OR ON ACCOUNT OF SAID CONTRACTOR FOR SAID BUILDING OR PREMISES.

_______________

SIGNATURE

BY:_______________

(PRINT NAME)

ITS:_______________

(PRINT TITLE)

SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME, THIS THE_______________DAY OF_______________ , 20 _______________ .

_______________

NOTARY PUBLIC

NOTICE: WHEN YOU EXECUTE AND SUBMIT THIS DOCUMENT, YOU SHALL BE CONCLUSIVELY DEEMED TO HAVE BEEN PAID IN FULL THE AMOUNT STATED ABOVE, EVEN IF YOU HAVE NOT ACTUALLY RECEIVED THE PAYMENT, SIXTY (60) DAYS AFTER THE DATE STATED ABOVE UNLESS YOU FILE EITHER AN AFFIDAVIT OF NONPAYMENT OR A CLAIM OF LIEN BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF THE SIXTY-DAY PERIOD. THE FAILURE TO INCLUDE THIS NOTICE LANGUAGE ON THE FACE OF THE FORM SHALL RENDER THE FORM UNENFORCEABLE AND INVALID AS A WAIVER AND RELEASE UNDER SECTION 85-7-419, MISSISSIPPI CODE OF 1972.

The following form is the Waiver and Release Upon Final Payment form referred to in Section 85-7-419:

WAIVER AND RELEASE UPON FINAL PAYMENT

STATE OF MISSISSIPPI

COUNTY OF_______________

THE UNDERSIGNED MECHANIC AND/OR MATERIALMAN HAS BEEN EMPLOYED BY_______________(NAME OF CONTRACTOR) TO FURNISH_______________(DESCRIBE MATERIALS AND/OR LABOR) FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF IMPROVEMENTS KNOWN AS_______________(TITLE OF THE PROJECT OR BUILDING) WHICH IS LOCATED IN THE CITY OF_______________ , COUNTY OF_______________ , AND IS OWNED BY_______________(NAME OF OWNER) AND MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:

(DESCRIBE THE PROPERTY UPON WHICH THE IMPROVEMENTS WERE MADE BY USING EITHER A METES AND BOUNDS DESCRIPTION, THE LAND LOT DISTRICT, BLOCK AND LOT NUMBER, OR STREET ADDRESS OF THE PROJECT.)

UPON THE RECEIPT OF THE SUM OF $ _______________ , THE MECHANIC AND/OR MATERIALMAN WAIVES AND RELEASES ANY AND ALL LIENS OR CLAIMS OF LIENS IT HAS UPON THE FOREGOING DESCRIBED PROPERTY OR ANY RIGHTS AGAINST ANY LABOR AND/OR MATERIAL BOND ON ACCOUNT OF LABOR OR MATERIALS, OR BOTH, FURNISHED BY THE UNDERSIGNED TO OR ON ACCOUNT OF SAID CONTRACTOR FOR SAID PROPERTY.

_______________

SIGNATURE

BY:_______________

(PRINT NAME)

ITS:_______________

(PRINT TITLE)

SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME, THIS THE_______________DAY OF_______________ , 20 _______________ .

_______________

NOTARY PUBLIC

NOTICE: WHEN YOU EXECUTE AND SUBMIT THIS DOCUMENT, YOU SHALL BE CONCLUSIVELY DEEMED TO HAVE BEEN PAID IN FULL THE AMOUNT STATED ABOVE, EVEN IF YOU HAVE NOT ACTUALLY RECEIVED THE PAYMENT, SIXTY (60) DAYS AFTER THE DATE STATED ABOVE UNLESS YOU FILE EITHER AN AFFIDAVIT OF NONPAYMENT OR A CLAIM OF LIEN BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF THE SIXTY-DAY PERIOD. THE FAILURE TO INCLUDE THIS NOTICE LANGUAGE ON THE FACE OF THE FORM SHALL RENDER THE FORM UNENFORCEABLE AND INVALID AS A WAIVER AND RELEASE UNDER SECTION 85-7-419, MISSISSIPPI CODE OF 1972.

_______________

SIGNATURE

BY:_______________

(PRINT NAME)

ITS:_______________

(PRINT TITLE)

SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME, THIS THE_______________DAY OF_______________ , 20 _______________ .

_______________

NOTARY PUBLIC

The following form is the Affidavit of Nonpayment referred to in Section 85-7-419:

AFFIDAVIT OF NONPAYMENT

STATE OF MISSISSIPPI

COUNTY OF_______________

THE UNDERSIGNED MECHANIC AND/OR MATERIALMAN HAS BEEN EMPLOYED BY_______________(NAME OF CONTRACTOR) TO FURNISH_______________(DESCRIBE MATERIALS AND/OR LABOR) FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF IMPROVEMENTS KNOWN AS_______________(TITLE OF THE PROJECT OR BUILDING) WHICH IS LOCATED IN THE CITY OF_______________ , COUNTY OF_______________ , AND IS OWNED BY_______________(NAME OF OWNER) AND MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:

(DESCRIBE THE PROPERTY UPON WHICH THE IMPROVEMENTS WERE MADE BY USING EITHER A METES AND BOUNDS DESCRIPTION, THE LAND LOT DISTRICT, BLOCK AND LOT NUMBER, OR STREET ADDRESS OF THE PROJECT.)

PURSUANT TO SECTION 85-7-419 THE UNDERSIGNED EXECUTED A LIEN WAIVER AND RELEASE WITH RESPECT TO THIS PROPERTY DATED_______________ ,_______________ . THE AMOUNT SET FORTH IN THE WAIVER AND RELEASE ($ _______________ ) HAS NOT BEEN PAID, AND THE UNDERSIGNED HEREBY GIVES NOTICE OF THE NONPAYMENT.

THE ABOVE FACTS ARE SWORN TRUE AND CORRECT BY THE UNDERSIGNED.

_______________

SIGNATURE

BY:_______________

(PRINT NAME)

ITS:_______________

(PRINT TITLE)

SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME, THIS THE_______________DAY OF_______________ , 20 _______________ .

_______________

NOTARY PUBLIC

WITHIN TWO (2) DAYS OF FILING THIS AFFIDAVIT OF NONPAYMENT, THE FILING PARTY SHALL SEND A COPY OF THE AFFIDAVIT BY REGISTERED OR CERTIFIED MAIL OR STATUTORY OVERNIGHT DELIVERY TO THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY. WHENEVER THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY IS AN ENTITY ON FILE WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE’S OFFICE, SENDING A COPY OF THE AFFIDAVIT TO THE COMPANY’S ADDRESS OR THE REGISTERED AGENT’S ADDRESS ON FILE WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL BE DEEMED SUFFICIENT.

The following form is the Notice of Contest of Lien form referred to in Section 85-7-423:

NOTICE OF CONTEST OF LIEN

STATE OF MISSISSIPPI

COUNTY OF_______________

TO: [NAME AND ADDRESS OF LIEN CLAIMANT]

YOU ARE NOTIFIED THAT THE UNDERSIGNED CONTESTS THE CLAIM OF LIEN FILED BY YOU ON_______________20 _______________ , AND RECORDED IN_______________BOOK_______________ , PAGE_______________OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS OF_______________COUNTY, MISSISSIPPI, AGAINST PROPERTY OWNED BY_______________ , AND THAT THE TIME WITHIN WHICH YOU MAY COMMENCE A PAYMENT ACTION TO ENFORCE YOUR LIEN IS LIMITED TO NINETY (90) DAYS FROM RECEIPT OF THIS NOTICE. THIS_______________DAY OF_______________ , 20 _______________ .

THIS ABOVE-REFERENCED LIEN WILL EXPIRE AND BE VOID IF YOU DO NOT: (1) COMMENCE A PAYMENT ACTION FOR RECOVERY OF THE AMOUNT OF THE LIEN CLAIM PURSUANT TO SECTION 85-7-405, MISSISSIPPI CODE OF 1972, WITHIN NINETY (90) DAYS FROM RECEIPT OF THIS NOTICE; AND (2) FILE A LIS PENDENS NOTICE OF THE PAYMENT ACTION WITH THE CHANCERY CLERK UPON COMMENCEMENT OF THE PAYMENT ACTION WITH A COPY TO THE LIEN CLAIMANT, OWNER AND CONTRACTOR.

_______________

SIGNATURE

BY:_______________

(PRINT NAME)

ITS:_______________

(PRINT TITLE)

SWORN TO AND SUBSCRIBED BEFORE ME, THIS THE_______________DAY OF_______________ , 20 _______________ .

_______________

NOTARY PUBLIC

The following form is the Pre-Lien Notice form referred to in Section 85-7-409(3):

PRE-LIEN NOTICE TO OWNER

TO: [NAME AND ADDRESS OF OWNER]

TAKE NOTICE THAT THE UNDERSIGNED IS A PERSON HAVING A RIGHT TO A LIEN PURSUANT TO SECTION 85-7-403, MISSISSIPPI CODE OF 1972, WHO DOES NOT HAVE A DIRECT CONTRACT WITH THE OWNER, HAS PROVIDED LABOR, SERVICES OR MATERIALS FOR THE IMPROVEMENT OF PROPERTY COMMONLY KNOWN AS_______________

(“THE PROPERTY”), FOR THE SUM OF $_______________FOR WHICH THE UNDERSIGNED HAS NOT BEEN PAID, AND INTENDS TO FILE A CLAIM OF SPECIAL LIEN ON THE SUBJECT PROPERTY IN TEN (10) OR MORE DAYS FROM THE DATE HEREOF.

SO NOTIFIED, THIS THE_______________DAY OF_______________ , 20 _______________ .

LIEN CLAIMANT:_______________

(PRINT NAME)

BY:_______________

ITS:_______________

(PRINT TITLE)

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 17; Laws, 2015, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.